Massachusetts, session 194th, H825.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 55 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the definition of “Candidate’s committee” the following definition:
“Adult-care services,” care services provided to a candidate’s parent or other adult
dependent, including, but not limited to, caregiving services by an individual, non-profit or for-
profit organization that provides such services, and any other costs directly related to such
services that occur as a result of campaign activities; provided, however, that expenses related to
adult-care services shall not include payments to a family member, as defined in section 1 of
chapter 50, of the individual receiving care, unless the family member owns, operates, or is
employed by a professional caregiving service, and the cost of the service is not greater than the
family member would otherwise charge.
SECTION 2. Section 6 of said chapter 55, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting, after the word “office,” in line 66, the following:
of 2

or expenses relating to the provision of adult-care services that would not otherwise exist
but for the existence of the campaign.
SECTION 3. The director of campaign and political finance shall promulgate regulations
for the implementation of this section within 90 days of enactment.
of 2